Georgia, session 2025_26, HB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding professions and businesses, is amended by adding a new Code section
to read as follows:
"43-1-4.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
H. B. 34 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 55 0467S
(1) 'License' means any document, permit, certificate of registration, or other
authorization issued by or on behalf of a professional licensing board that is required for
a person to engage in a profession, business, or trade.
(2) 'Licensee' means any person who is required to be licensed or who is actually
licensed by a professional licensing board.
(b) The office of the Secretary of State on behalf of all professional licensing boards under
its jurisdiction that require continuing education shall establish a continuing education
tracking solution to monitor compliance of licensees with applicable continuing education
requirements and to determine whether a licensee is in full compliance with such
requirements at the time of making application for license renewal. Such tracking solution
may be an off-premises hosted software-as-a-service application accessible through a
public website. The Secretary of State may contract with third parties to implement,
integrate, or otherwise provide such tracking system.
(c) On and after January 1, 2026, a professional licensing board shall not renew a license
until the applicant has complied with all applicable continuing education requirements as
verified using the continuing education tracking solution required by subsection (b) of this
Code section. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a professional licensing board from
granting a waiver or imposing additional penalties as otherwise provided by law or by the
rules or regulations of the applicable board for failure to comply with continuing education
requirements.
(d) The professional licensing boards and the division director may adopt any rules and
regulations necessary to implement this Code section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 34 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 55 0467S
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 34 (SUB)
- 3 -